Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1832
Authority; administrative costs; apportionment.

The authority may charge to and equitably apportion among participating elementary or secondary schools its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 32.